Utah statutes.
54-8b-9.   Commission's jurisdiction under other provisions of title not enlarged or reduced by chapter.

(1)  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to enlarge or reduce the commission's jurisdiction over the services and entities for which jurisdiction is provided or excluded by other provisions of this title.

(2)  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to enlarge the commission's jurisdiction over:

(a)  providers of:

(i)  cellular or wireless telecommunications services; or

(ii)  the one-way transmission to subscribers of video programming and the subscriber interaction, if any, which is required for the selection of the video programming; or

(b)  telecommunications companies classified as cooperatives.

(3)  Nothing in this chapter shall diminish the commission's authority to regulate the quality of telecommunications services provided by telecommunications corporations.



Amended by Chapter 269, 1995 General Session

